North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 12. Food, Drugs and Cosmetics.

§ 106-120.
Title of Article.

This Article may be cited as the North Carolina Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this enactment, see 17 N.C.L. Rev. 400 (1939).

§ 106-121.
Definitions and general consideration.

For the purpose of this Article:

The term “advertisement” means all representations disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purposes of inducing, or which are likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of food, drugs, devices or cosmetics.

(1a)

The term “color” includes black, white, and intermediate grays.

(1b)

The term “color additive” means a material which:

Is a dye, pigment, or other substance made by a process of synthesis or similar artifice, or extracted, isolated, or otherwise derived, with or without intermediate or final change of identity, from a vegetable, animal, mineral, or other source; or

When added or applied to a food, drug, or cosmetic, or to the human body or any part thereof, is capable (alone or through reaction with other substance) of imparting color thereto;

Provided, that such term does not apply to any pesticide chemical, soil or plant nutrient, or other agricultural chemical solely because of its effect in aiding, retarding, or otherwise affecting, directly or indirectly, the growth or other natural physiological process of produce of the soil and thereby affecting its color, whether before or after harvest.

The term “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture; the term “Department” means the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and the term “Board” means the Board of Agriculture.

(2a)

The term “consumer commodity” except as otherwise specifically provided by this subdivision means any food, drug, device, or cosmetic as those terms are defined by this Article. Such term does not include:

Any tobacco or tobacco product; or

Any commodity subject to packaging or labeling requirements imposed under the North Carolina Pesticide Law of 1971, Article 52, Chapter 143, of the General Statutes of North Carolina, or the provisions of the eighth paragraph under the heading “Bureau of Animal Industry” of the act of March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 832-833; 21 U.S.C. 151-157) commonly known as the Virus-Serum Toxin Act; or

Any drug subject to the provisions of G.S. 106-134(13) or 106-134.1 of this Article or section 503(b)(1) or 506 of the federal act; or

Any beverage subject to or complying with packaging or labeling requirements imposed under the Federal Alcohol Administration Act (27 U.S.C., et seq.); or

Any commodity subject to the provisions of the North Carolina Seed Law, Article 31, Chapter 106 of the General Statutes of North Carolina.

The term “contaminated with filth” applies to any food, drug, device or cosmetic not securely protected from dust, dirt, and as far as may be necessary by all reasonable means, from all foreign or injurious contaminations.

The term “cosmetic” means

Articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance, and

Articles intended for use as a component of any such articles, except that such terms shall not include soap.

(4a)

The term “counterfeit drug” means a drug which, or the container or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name or other identifying mark, imprint, or device, or any likeness thereof, of a drug manufacturer, processor, packer or distributor other than the person or persons who in fact manufactured, processed, packed or distributed such drug and which thereby falsely purports or is represented to be the product of, or to have been packed or distributed by, such other drug manufacturer, processor, packer or distributor.

The term “device,” except when used in subdivision (15) of this section and in

G.S. 106-122

, subdivision (10), 106-130, subdivision (6), 106-134, subdivision (3) and 106-137, subdivision (3) means instruments, apparatus and contrivances, including their components, parts and accessories, intended

For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals; or

To affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals.

The term “drug” means

Articles recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them; and

Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in man or other animals; and

Articles (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals; and

Articles intended for use as a component of any article specified in paragraphs a, b or c; but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

The term “federal act” means the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act (Title 21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.; 52 Stat. 1040 et seq.).

The term “food” means

Articles used for food or drink for man or other animals,

Chewing gum, and

Articles used for components of any such article.

(8a)

The term “food additive” means any substance, the intended use of which results or may be reasonably expected to result, directly or indirectly, in its becoming a component or otherwise affecting the characteristics of any food (including any substance intended for use in producing, manufacturing, packing, processing, preparing, treating, packaging, transporting or holding food; and including any source of radiation intended for any such use) if such substance is not generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate its safety, as having been adequately shown through scientific procedures (or, in the case of a substance used in a food prior to January 1, 1958, through either scientific procedures or experience based on common use in food) to be safe under the conditions of its intended use; except that such term does not include:

a.

A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity; or

b.

A pesticide chemical to the extent that it is intended for use or is used in the production, storage, or transportation of any raw agricultural commodity; or

c.

A color additive; or

Any substance used in accordance with a sanction or approval granted prior to the enactment of the Food Additives Amendment of 1958, pursuant to the federal act; the Poultry Products Inspection Act (21 U.S.C. 451 et seq.) or the Meat Inspection Act of March 4, 1907 (34 Stat. 1260), as amended and extended (21 U.S.C. 71 et seq.).

The term “immediate container” does not include package liners.

The term “label” means a display of written, printed or graphic matter upon the immediate container of any article; and a requirement made by or under authority of this Article that any word, statement, or other information appearing on the label shall not be considered to be complied with unless such word, statement, or other information also appears on the outside container or wrapper, if any there be, of the retail package of such article, or is easily legible through the outside container or wrapper.

The term “labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter

Upon an article or any of its containers or wrappers, or

Accompanying such article.

(11a)

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 226, s. 1.

The term “new drug” means

Any drug the composition of which is such that such drug is not generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of drugs, as safe and effective for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof; or

Any drug the composition of which is such that such drug, as a result of investigations to determine its safety and effectiveness for use under such conditions, has become so recognized, but which has not, otherwise than in such investigation, been used to a material extent or for a material time under such conditions.

(12a)

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 226, s. 1.

The term “official compendium” means the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them.

(13a)

The term “package” means any container or wrapping in which any consumer commodity is enclosed for use in the delivery or display of that consumer commodity to retail purchasers, but does not include:

Shipping containers or wrappings used solely for the transportation of any consumer commodity in bulk or in quantity to manufacturers, packers, or processors, or to wholesale or retail distributors thereof; or

Shipping containers or outer wrappings used by retailers to ship or deliver any commodity to retail customers if such containers and wrappings bear no printed matter pertaining to any particular commodity.

The term “person” includes individual, partnership, corporation, and association.

(14a)

The term “pesticide chemical” means any substance which, alone, in chemical combination, or in formulation with one or more other substances is a “pesticide” within the meaning of the North Carolina Pesticide Law of 1971, Article 52, Chapter 143, of the General Statutes of North Carolina, or the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. 135 et seq.), and which is used in the production, storage, or transportation of raw agricultural commodities.

(14b)

The term “practitioner” means a physician, dentist, veterinarian or other person licensed, registered or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a drug so long as such activity is within the normal course of professional practice or research.

(14c)

The term “principal display panel” means that part of a label that is most likely to be displayed, presented, shown, or examined under normal and customary conditions of display for retail sale.

(14d)

The term “raw agricultural commodity” means any food in its raw or natural state, including all fruits that are washed, colored, or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form prior to marketing.

(14e),

(14f) Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 226, s. 1.

If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading, or if an advertisement is alleged to be false because it is misleading, then in determining whether the labeling or advertisement is misleading, there shall be taken into account (among other things) not only representations made or suggested by statement, word, design, device, sound, or any combination thereof, but also the extent to which labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts material in the light of such representations or material with respect to consequences which may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof or under such conditions of use as are customary or usual.

The representation of a drug, in its labeling or advertisement, as an antiseptic shall be considered to be a representation that it is a germicide, except in the case of a drug purporting to be, or represented as, an antiseptic for inhibitory use as a wet dressing, ointment, dusting powder, or such other use as involves prolonged contact with the body.

The provisions of this Article regarding the selling of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics, shall be considered to include the manufacture, production, processing, packing, exposure, offer, possession, and holding of any such article for sale; and the sale, dispensing, and giving of any such article; and the supplying or applying of any such article in the conduct of any food, drug or cosmetic establishment.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 2; 1975, c. 614, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 737, s. 1; 1989, c. 226, s. 1; 1997-261, s. 32.

§ 106-122.
Certain acts prohibited.

The following acts and the causing thereof within the State of North Carolina are hereby prohibited:

The manufacture, sale, or delivery, holding or offering for sale of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded.

The adulteration or misbranding of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic.

The receipt in commerce of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded, and the delivery or proffered delivery thereof for pay or otherwise.

The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of any article in violation of

G.S. 106-131

or 106-135.

The dissemination of any false advertisement.

The refusal to permit entry or inspection, or to permit the taking of a sample, or to permit access to or copying of any record as authorized by

G.S. 106-140

.

The giving of a guaranty or undertaking which guaranty or undertaking is false, except by a person who relied on a guaranty or undertaking to the same effect signed by, and containing the name and address of the person residing in the State of North Carolina from whom he received in good faith the food, drug, device or cosmetic.

The removal or disposal of a detained or embargoed article in violation of

G.S. 106-125

.

The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or removal of the whole or any part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to, a food, drug, device or cosmetic, if such act is done while such article is held for sale and results in such article being misbranded or adulterated.

Forging, counterfeiting, simulating, or falsely representing, or without proper authority using any mark, stamp, tag, label or other identification device authorized or required by regulations promulgated under the provisions of this Article.

The using, on the labeling of any drug or in any advertisement relating to such drug, of any representation or suggestion that an application with respect to such drug is effective under

G.S. 106-135

, or that such drug complies with the provisions of such section.

The sale at retail of any food for which a definition and standard of identity for enrichment with vitamins, minerals or other nutrients has been promulgated by the Board, unless such food conforms to such definition and standard, or has been specifically exempted from same by the Board.

The distribution in commerce of a consumer commodity, as defined in this Article, if such commodity is contained in a package, or if there is affixed to that commodity a label, which does not conform to the provisions of this Article and regulations promulgated under authority of this Article; provided, however, that this prohibition shall not apply to persons engaged in business as wholesale or retail distributors of consumer commodities except to the extent that such persons:

Are engaged in the packaging or labeling of such commodities; or

Prescribe or specify by any means the manner in which such commodities are packaged or labeled.

The using by any person to his own advantage, or revealing, other than to the Commissioner or authorized officers or employees of the Department, or to the courts when relevant in any judicial proceeding under this Article, any information acquired under authority of this Article concerning any method or process which as a trade secret is entitled to protection.

In the case of a prescription drug distributed or offered for sale in this State, the failure of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor thereof to maintain for transmittal, or to transmit, to any practitioner licensed by applicable law to administer such drug within the normal course of professional practice, who makes written request for information as to such drug, true and correct copies of all printed matter which is required to be included in any package in which that drug is distributed or sold, or such other printed matter as is approved under the federal act. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to exempt any person from any labeling requirement imposed by or under other provisions of this Article.

Placing or causing to be placed upon any drug or device or container thereof, with intent to defraud, the trade name or other identifying mark, or imprint of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing; or

Selling, dispensing, disposing of or causing to be sold, dispensed or disposed of, or concealing or keeping in possession, control or custody, with intent to sell, dispense or dispose of, any drug, device or any container thereof, with knowledge that the trade name or other identifying mark or imprint of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing has been placed thereon in a manner prohibited by subsection (a) of this section; or

Making, selling, or disposing of; causing to be made, sold or disposed of; keeping in possession, control or custody; or concealing any punch, die, plate, stone, or other thing designed to print, imprint, or reproduce the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof so as to render such drug a counterfeit drug.

The doing of any act which causes a drug to be a counterfeit drug, or the sale or dispensing, or the holding for sale or dispensing of a counterfeit drug.

Dispensing or causing to be dispensed a different drug in place of the drug ordered or prescribed without the express permission of the person ordering or prescribing.

The acquiring or obtaining or attempting to acquire or obtain any drug subject to the provisions of G.S. 106-134.1(a)(3) or (4) by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or subterfuge, or by forgery or alteration of a prescription, or by the use of a false name, or the giving of a false address.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 3; 1975, c. 614, ss. 3-5.

§ 106-123.
Injunctions restraining violations.

In addition to the remedies hereinafter provided, the Commissioner of Agriculture is hereby authorized to apply to the superior court for, and such court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of

G.S. 106-122

, irrespective of whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 4.

§ 106-124.
Violations made misdemeanor.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any provision of this Article, or any regulation of the Board adopted pursuant to this Article, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. In addition, if any person continues to violate or further violates any provision of this Article after written notice from the Commissioner, or his duly designated agent, the court may determine that each day during which the violation continued or is repeated constitutes a separate violation subject to the foregoing penalties.

No person shall be subject to the penalties of subsection (a) of this section, for having violated

G.S. 106-122

, subdivision (1) or (3) if he establishes a guaranty or undertaking signed by, and containing the name and address of, the person residing in the State of North Carolina from whom he received in good faith the article, to the effect that such article is not adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of this Article, designating this article.

No publisher, radio-broadcast licensee, or agency or medium for the dissemination of an advertisement, except the manufacturer, packer, distributor, or seller of the article to which a false advertisement relates, shall be liable under this section by reason of the dissemination by him of such false advertisement, unless he has refused on the request of the Commissioner of Agriculture to furnish the Commissioner the name and post-office address of the manufacturer, packer, distributor, seller or advertising agency residing in the State of North Carolina who caused him to disseminate such advertisement.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 5; 1975, c. 614, s. 6; 1993, c. 539, s. 744; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-124.1.
Civil penalties.

The Commissioner may assess a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) against any person who violates a provision of this Article or any rule adopted pursuant to this Article. In determining the amount of the penalty, the Commissioner shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation.

Prior to assessing a civil penalty, the Commissioner shall give the person written notice of the violation and a reasonable period of time in which to correct the violation. However, the Commissioner shall not be required to give a person time to correct a violation before assessing a penalty if the Commissioner determines the violation is likely to cause future physical injury or illness.

The Commissioner shall consider the training and management practices implemented by the person for the purpose of complying with this Article as a mitigating factor when determining the amount of the civil penalty.

The Commissioner shall remit the clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

2003-389, s. 1.

§ 106-125.
Detention of product or article suspected of being adulterated or misbranded.

Whenever a duly authorized agent of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services finds or has probable cause to believe, that any food, drug, device, cosmetic or consumer commodity is adulterated, or so misbranded as to be dangerous or fraudulent within the meaning of this Article or is in violation of

G.S. 106-131

or 106-135 of this Article, he shall affix to such article a tag or other appropriate marking giving notice that such article is, or is suspected of being, adulterated or misbranded and has been detained or embargoed, and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of such article by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by such agent or the court. It shall be unlawful for any person to remove or dispose of such detained or embargoed article by sale or otherwise without such permission.

When an article detained or embargoed under subsection (a) has been found by such agent to be adulterated, or misbranded or to be in violation of

G.S. 106-131

or 106-135 of this Article, he shall petition a judge of the district, or superior court in whose jurisdiction the article is detained or embargoed for an order for condemnation of such article. When such agent has found that an article so detained or embargoed is not adulterated or misbranded, he shall remove the tag or other marking.

If the court finds that a detained or embargoed article is adulterated or misbranded, such article shall, after entry of the decree, be destroyed at the expense of the claimant thereof, under the supervision of such agent; and all court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses, shall be taxed against the claimant of such article or his agent: Provided, that when the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the article, the court, after entry of the decree and after such costs, fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond, conditioned that such article shall be so labeled or processed, has been executed, may by order direct that such article be delivered to the claimant thereof for such labeling or processing under the supervision of an agent of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The expense of such supervision shall be paid by the claimant. Such bond shall be returned to the claimant of the article on representation to the court by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services that the article is no longer in violation of this Article, and that the expenses of such supervision have been paid.

Whenever any duly authorized agent of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall find in any room, building, vehicle of transportation or other structure, any meat, seafood, poultry, vegetable, fruit or other perishable articles which are unsound, or contain any filthy, decomposed or putrid substance, or that may be poisonous or deleterious to health or otherwise unsafe, the same being hereby declared to be a nuisance, the agent shall forthwith condemn or destroy the same, or in any other manner render the same unsalable as human food.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 6; 1973, c. 108, s. 53; 1975, c. 614, ss. 7-9; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-126.
Prosecutions of violations.

It shall be the duty of the solicitors and district attorneys of this State to promptly prosecute all violations of this Article.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 7; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 108, s. 54; 1975, c. 614, s. 10.

§ 106-127.
Report of minor violations in discretion of Commissioner.

Nothing in this Article shall be construed as requiring the Commissioner of Agriculture to report for the institution of proceedings under this Article, minor violations of this Article, whenever the Commissioner believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 8.

§ 106-128.
Establishment of reasonable standards of quality by Board of Agriculture.

Whenever in the judgment of the Board of Agriculture such action will promote honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, the Board shall promulgate regulations fixing and establishing for any food or class of food a reasonable definition and standard of identity, and/or reasonable standard of quality and/or fill of container. In prescribing a definition and standard of identity for any food or class of food in which optional ingredients are permitted, the Board shall, for the purpose of promoting honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, designate the optional ingredients which shall be named on the label. The definitions and standards so promulgated shall conform so far as practicable to the definitions and standards promulgated by the Commissioner of the Federal Food and Drug Administration under authority conferred by section 401 of the federal act.

Temporary permits now or hereafter granted for interstate shipment of experimental packs of food varying from the requirements of federal definitions and standards of identity are automatically effective in this State under the conditions provided in such permits. In addition, the Board of Agriculture may cause to be issued additional permits where they are necessary to the completion or conclusiveness of an otherwise adequate investigation and where the interests of consumers are safeguarded. Such permits are subject to the terms and conditions the Board of Agriculture may prescribe by regulation.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 9; 1975, c. 614, ss. 11, 12.

§ 106-129.
Foods deemed to be adulterated.

A food shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added substance such food shall not be considered adulterated under this paragraph if the quantity of such substance in such food does not ordinarily render it injurious to health; or

1. If it bears or contains any added poisonous or added deleterious substance, other than one which is

If it consists in whole or in part of a diseased, contaminated, filthy, putrid or decomposed substance, or if it is otherwise unfit for food; or

If it has been produced, prepared, packed or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered diseased, unwholesome or injurious to health; or

If it is the product of a diseased animal or an animal which has died otherwise than by slaughter, or that has been fed upon the uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse; or

If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health;

If it has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation was in conformity with a regulation or exemption in effect pursuant to

G.S. 106-132

of this Article; or

If a retail or wholesale establishment has added sulfiting agents, including sulfur dioxide, sodium sulfite, sodium or potassium bisulfite, and sodium or potassium metabisulfite, separately or in combination, to fresh fruits and fresh vegetables intended for retail sale as fresh food products.

(2) a.

If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted therefrom; or
b.

If any substance has been substituted wholly or in part therefor; or

c.

If damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner; or

d.

If any substance has been added thereto or mixed or packed therewith so as to increase its bulk or weight, or reduce its quality or strength or make it appear better or of greater value than it is.

(3)

If it is confectionery, and:

a.

Has partially or completely imbedded therein any nonnutritive object: Provided, that this clause shall not apply in the case of any nonnutritive object if, in the judgment of the Board of Agriculture as provided by regulations, such object is of practical functional value to the confectionery product and would not render the product injurious or hazardous to health; or

b.

Bears or contains more than five percent (5%) alcohol by volume. Confectionery that contains more than five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) alcohol by volume shall conspicuously bear a label indicating alcohol content; or

c.

Bears or contains any nonnutritive substance: Provided, that this clause shall not apply to a safe nonnutritive substance which is in or on confectionery by reason of its use for some practical functional purpose in the manufacture, packaging, or storing of such confectionery if the use of the substance does not promote deception of the consumer or otherwise result in adulteration or misbranding in violation of any provision of this Article; and provided further, that the Board may, for the purpose of avoiding or resolving uncertainty as to the application of this clause, issue regulations allowing or prohibiting the use of particular nonnutritive substances.

(4)

If it is or bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of

G.S. 106-132

.

A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity;

A food additive; or

A color additive, which is unsafe within the meaning of

G.S. 106-132

; or

2.

If it is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of

G.S. 106-132

; or

3.

If it is or it bears or contains any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of G.S. 106-132;

provided, that where a pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or tolerance prescribed under G.S. 106-132 of this Article, and such raw agricultural commodity has been subjected to processing such as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling, the residue of such pesticide chemical remaining in or on such processed food shall, notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 106-132 and clause 3 of this section, not be deemed unsafe if such residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has been removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing practice, and the concentration of such residue in the processed food when ready-to-eat, is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity; or

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 10; 1975, c. 614, ss. 13-16; 1985, c. 399; 2011-26, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-26, s. 1, effective April 7, 2011, rewrote subdivision (3)b., which formerly read: “Bears or contains any alcohol other than alcohol not in excess of one half of one per centum (0.5%) by volume derived solely from the use of flavoring extracts.”

Legal Periodicals.

For note on control of pesticides, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 529 (1971).

§ 106-130.
Foods deemed misbranded.

A food shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular, or

If its labeling or packaging fails to conform with the requirements of

G.S. 106-139

and 106-139.1 of this Article.

If it is offered for sale under the name of another food.

If it is an imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the word “imitation” and, immediately thereafter, the name of the food imitated.

If its container is so made, formed or filled as to be misleading.

If in package form, unless it bears a label containing

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count, which statement shall be separately and accurately stated in a uniform location upon the principal display panel of the label:

Provided, that under paragraph b of this subdivision reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established, by regulations prescribed by the Board of Agriculture.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this Article to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If it purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of identity has been prescribed by regulations as provided by

G.S. 106-128

, unless

It conforms to such definition and standard, and

Its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard, and, insofar as may be required by such regulations, the common names of optional ingredients (other than spices, flavoring, and coloring) present in such food.

If it purports to be or is represented as

A food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed by regulations as provided by

G.S. 106-128

and its quality falls below such standard unless its label bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such standard; or

A food for which a standard or standards of fill of container have been prescribed by regulation as provided by

G.S. 106-128

, and it falls below the standard of fill of container applicable thereto, unless its label bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such standard.

If it is not subject to the provisions of subdivision (7) of this section, unless its label bears

The common or usual name of the food, if any there be, and

In case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each such ingredient; except that spices, flavorings, and colorings, other than those sold as such, may be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings without naming each:

Provided, that, to the extent that compliance with the requirements of paragraph b of this subdivision is impracticable or results in deception or unfair competition, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the Board of Agriculture.

If it purports to be or is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears such information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties as the Board of Agriculture determines to be, and by regulations prescribes as, necessary in order to fully inform purchasers as to its value for such uses.

If it bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical preservatives, unless it bears labeling stating that fact: Provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subdivision are impracticable, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the Board of Agriculture. The provisions of this subdivision and subdivisions (7) and (9) with respect to artificial coloring do not apply to butter, cheese, or ice cream. The provisions of this subdivision with respect to chemical preservatives do not apply to a pesticide chemical when used in or on a raw agricultural commodity which is the product of the soil.

If it is a raw agricultural commodity which is the produce of the soil, bearing or containing a pesticide chemical applied after harvest, unless the shipping container of such commodity bears labeling which declares the presence of such chemical in or on such commodity and the common or usual name and the function of such chemical: Provided, however, that no such declaration shall be required while such commodity, having been removed from the shipping container, is being held or displayed for sale at retail out of such container in accordance with the custom of the trade.

If it is a product intended as an ingredient of another food and when used according to the directions of the purveyor will result in the final food product being adulterated or misbranded.

If it is a color additive unless its packaging and labeling are in conformity with such packaging and labeling requirements applicable to such color additive prescribed under the provisions of

G.S. 106-132

of this Article.

If the labeling provided by the manufacturer, packer, distributor, or retailer on meat, meat products, poultry, or seafood includes a “sell-by” date or other indicator of a last recommended day of sale, and the date has been removed, obscured, or altered by any person other than the customer. This subdivision does not prohibit the removal of a label for the purpose of repackaging and relabeling a food item so long as the new package or new label does not bear a “sell-by” date or other indicator of a last recommended day of sale later than the original package. This subdivision does not prohibit relabeling of meat, meat products, poultry, or seafood that has had its shelf life extended through freezing, cooking, or other additional processing that extends the shelf life of the product.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 11; 1975, c. 614, ss. 17-20; 2000-67, s. 7.10.